California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Not later than March 1, 2004, after holding a public hearing, the board shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt one or more model ordinances, suitable for modification by a local agency, that the local agency may adopt that will require a range of diversion rates of construction and demolition waste materials from 50 to 75 percent, as determined by the board, and as measured by weight.

(2) Consult with representatives of the League of California Cities, the California State Association of Counties, private and public waste services and building construction materials industry and construction management personnel throughout the development of the model ordinances.

(3) Compile a report on programs, other than a model ordinance, that local governments and general contractors can implement to increase diversion of construction and demolition waste materials.

(4) Post on the board’s Internet Web site, a report for general contractors on methods by which contractors can increase diversion of construction and demolition waste materials.

(5) Post on the board’s Internet Web site, a report for local governments with suggestions of programs, in addition to adoption of the model ordinance, to increase diversion of construction and demolition waste materials.

(b) Not later than January 1, 2004, the board shall distribute the draft model ordinance to all local agencies and other interested parties for review. Any comments shall be submitted to the board by February 1, 2004, for consideration at the public hearing of the board to adopt the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 501, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18.5. State Agency Integrated Waste Management Plan [42920. - 42927.]

42920.

(a) On or before February 15, 2000, the board shall adopt a state agency model integrated waste management plan for source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2000, each state agency shall develop and adopt, in consultation with the board, an integrated waste management plan, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. The plan shall build upon existing programs and measures, including the state agency model integrated waste management plan adopted by the board pursuant to subdivision (a), that will reduce solid waste, reuse materials whenever possible, recycle recyclable materials, and procure products with recycled content in all state agency offices and facilities, including any leased locations. It is the intent of the Legislature that the local jurisdiction and the state agency or large state facility located within that jurisdiction work together to implement the state agency integrated waste management plan.

(2) Each state agency shall submit an adopted integrated waste management plan to the board for review and approval on or before July 15, 2000. The board shall adopt procedures for reviewing and approving those integrated waste management plans. The board shall complete its plan review process on or before January 1, 2001.

(3) If a state agency has not submitted an adopted integrated waste management plan or the model integrated waste management plan with revisions to the board by January 1, 2001, or if the board has disapproved the plan that was submitted, then the model integrated waste management plan, as revised by the board in consultation with the agency, shall take effect on that date, or on a later date as determined by the board, and shall have the same force and effect as if adopted by the state agency.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 12217 of the Public Contract Code, at least one solid waste reduction and recycling coordinator shall be designated by each state agency. The coordinator shall perform the duties imposed pursuant to this chapter using existing resources. The coordinator shall be responsible for implementing the integrated waste management plan and shall serve as a liaison to other state agencies and coordinators.

(d) The board shall provide technical assistance to state agencies for the purpose of implementing the integrated waste management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42921.

(a) Each state agency and each large state facility shall divert at least 25 percent of all solid waste generated by the state agency by January 1, 2002, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(b) On and after January 1, 2004, each state agency and each large state facility shall divert at least 50 percent of all solid waste through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 343, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

42921.5.

(a) After January 1, 2009, the board shall determine each state agency’s or a large state facility’s compliance with Section 42921, for each year, commencing with January 1, 2007, by comparing the per capita disposal rate in subsequent years with the equivalent per capita disposal rate that would have been necessary for the state agency or large state facility to comply with Section 42921 on January 1, 2007, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) In making a determination whether a state agency or large state facility is in compliance with the requirements of Section 42921, the board may consider an agency’s or facility’s per capita disposal rate as a factor in determining whether the state agency or large state facility is adequately implementing its integrated waste management plan. The board shall not consider a state, agency, or large state facility’s per capita disposal rate to be determinative when considering whether the agency or facility is implementing its integrated waste management plan.

(c) When determining whether an agency or facility is in compliance with Section 42921, the board shall consider that an increase in the per capita disposal rate is a result of disposal amounts increasing faster than the growth of the state agency or large state facility. The board shall use an increase in the per capita disposal rate that is in excess of the equivalent per capita disposal rate as a factor in determining whether the board is required to more closely examine the agency’s or facility’s plan implementation efforts. If indicated by this examination, the board may require a state agency or large state facility to expand existing programs or implement new programs.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), “per capita disposal” or “per capita disposal rate” means the total annual disposal by a state agency or large state facility, in pounds, divided by total number of employees in that state agency or large state facility, and divided by 365 days.

(2) The board may alternatively define per capita disposal or per capita disposal rate for a state agency or large state facility that has a significant amount of disposal from nonemployees or for other reasons that would make calculation of per capita disposal by the number of employees inaccurate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 343, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

42924.

(a) On or before February 15, 2000, the board shall develop and adopt requirements relating to adequate areas for collecting, storing, and loading recyclable materials in state buildings. In developing the requirements, the board may rely on the model ordinance adopted pursuant to Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 42900).

(b) Each state agency or large state facility, when entering into a new lease, or renewing an existing lease, shall ensure that adequate areas are provided for, and adequate personnel are available to oversee, the collection, storage, and loading of recyclable materials in compliance with the requirements established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) In the design and construction of state agency offices and facilities, the Department of General Services shall allocate adequate space for the collection, storage, and loading of recyclable materials in compliance with the requirements established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 764, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

42924.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2017, the department shall develop guidance for collecting and recycling recyclable materials in office buildings of state agencies and large state facilities.

(b) For purposes of this section, “recyclable materials” shall include, but are not limited to, paper, plastic, metal, and organic waste.

(c) On and after July 1, 2018, a state agency and large state facility, for each
 office building of the state agency or large state facility, shall provide adequate receptacles, signage, education, and staffing, and arrange for recycling services consistent with Sections 42649.2 and 42649.81.

(d) At least once per year, a state agency and large state facility shall review the adequacy and condition of receptacles for
 recyclable material and of associated signage, education, and staffing.

(e) For purposes of this section, “state agency” and “large state facility” do not include buildings or facilities of community college districts or their campuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   (AB 2812)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42925.

(a) Any cost savings realized as a result of the state agency integrated waste management plan shall, to the extent feasible, be redirected to the agency’s integrated waste management plan to fund plan implementation and administration costs, in accordance with Sections 12167 and 12167.1 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) The board shall establish and implement a waste reduction award program for state agencies and large state facilities that develop, adopt, and implement innovative and effective integrated waste management plans in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 764, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

42926.

(a) In addition to the information provided to the department pursuant to Section 12167.1 of the Public Contract Code, each state agency shall submit an annual report to the department summarizing its progress in reducing solid waste as required by Section 42921. The annual report shall be due on or before May 1 of each year. The information in this report shall encompass the previous calendar year.

(b) A
 state agency’s annual report to the department shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) Calculations of annual disposal reduction.

(2) Information on the changes in waste generated or disposed of due to increases or decreases in employees, economics, or other factors.

(3) A summary of progress made in implementing the integrated waste management plan.

(4) The extent to which the state agency intends to utilize programs or facilities established by the local agency for the handling, diversion, and disposal of solid waste. If the state agency does not intend to utilize those established programs or facilities, the state agency shall identify sufficient disposal capacity for solid waste that is not source reduced,
 recycled, or composted.

(5) A summary of the state agency’s compliance with the requirements specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 42924.5. 

(6) A summary of the state agency’s compliance with Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 42649) and Chapter 12.9 (commencing with Section 42649.8), if applicable. 

(7) Other information relevant to compliance with Section 42921.

(c) The department shall use, but is not limited to the use of, the annual report in the determination of whether the agency’s integrated waste management plan needs to be revised.

(d) For purposes of this section, the meaning of “state agency” does not include a district agricultural association, as defined in Section 3951 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 2812)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42927.

(a) A community college district shall give first priority for the expenditure of the revenues derived from the sale of recyclable materials resulting from the implementation of the district’s integrated waste management plan for the purposes of offsetting the recycling program costs imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A community college district shall expend all cost savings that result from implementation of the district’s integrated waste management plan pursuant to this chapter to fund the continued implementation of the plan consistent with the requirement that revenues from the sale of recyclable materials be used to offset recycling program costs, as specified in Sections 12167 and 12167.1 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) A community college district shall provide information on the quantities of recyclable materials collected for recycling annually to the board, according to a schedule determined by the board and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 343, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Tire Hauler Registration [42950. - 42967.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42950. - 42950.]

42950.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Agricultural purposes” means the use of waste tires as bumpers on agricultural equipment or as a ballast to maintain covers or structures at an agricultural site.

(b) (1) “Altered waste tire” means a waste tire that has been baled, shredded, chopped, or split apart. “Altered waste tire” does not mean crumb rubber.

(2) “Alteration” or “altering,” with reference to a waste tire, means an action that produces an altered waste tire.

(c) “Applicant” means a person
 seeking to register as a waste tire hauler.

(d) “Baled tire” means either a whole or an altered tire that has been compressed and then secured with a binding material for the purpose of reducing its volume.

(e) “Common carrier” means a “common carrier,” as defined in Section 211 of the Public Utilities Code.

(f) “Crumb rubber” means rubber granules derived from a waste tire that are less than or one-quarter inch or six millimeters in size.

(g) “Repairable tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is retreadable, recappable, or regrooveable, or that can be otherwise repaired to return the tire to use as a vehicle tire, and that meets the applicable requirements of the Vehicle Code and Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(h) “Scrap tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is not a repairable tire.

(i) “Tire broker” means a person that arranges for the shipment of used or waste tires to or from a site located within the state, or through the state, as that term may be further defined by the department by regulation. “Tire broker” does not include a tire retailer primarily engaged in the retail sale, service, and installation of new tires on customer vehicles, or a vehicle dealer, as defined in Section 285 of the Vehicle Code.

(j) “Tire derived product” means material that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Is derived from a process using waste tires or waste tire equivalents as a feedstock. A process using waste tires or waste tire equivalents
 includes, but is not limited to, shredding, crumbing, or chipping.

(2) Has been sold and removed from the processing facility.

(k) “Used tire” means a tire that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The tire is no longer mounted on a vehicle but is still suitable for use as a vehicle tire.

(2) The tire meets the applicable requirements of the Vehicle Code and of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(l) “Waste tire” means a tire that is no longer mounted on a vehicle and is no longer suitable for use as a vehicle tire due to wear, damage, or deviation from the manufacturer’s original specifications. A waste tire includes a repairable tire, scrap tire, and altered waste
 tire, but does not include a tire derived product, crumb rubber, or a used tire.

(m) “Waste tire generator” or “waste tire generating business” means a person as defined by Section 40170 whose act or process produces waste tires as defined in Section 42807, causes a waste tire hauler to transport those waste tires, or otherwise causes waste tires to become subject to regulation. “Waste tire generator” or “waste tire generating business” does not include a person who transports 10 or fewer waste tires at any one time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (AB 501)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration and General Provisions [42951. - 42957.]

42951.

(a) Every person who engages in the transportation of waste or used tires shall hold a valid waste and used tire hauler registration, unless exempt as specified in Section 42954.

(b) A registered waste and used tire hauler shall only transport waste or used tires to a facility that is permitted, excluded, exempted, or otherwise authorized by the department, by statute, or by regulation, to accept waste and used tires, or to a facility that lawfully accepts waste or used tires for reuse or disposal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42952.

(a) Except as provided in Section 42954, a person engaged in transporting waste or used tires shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) The person shall be registered as a waste and used tire hauler with the department.

(2) The person shall not advertise or represent himself or herself as being in the business of a waste and used tire hauler without being registered as a waste and used tire hauler by the department.

(b) A tire broker shall register with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 15.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42953.

Any person who gives, contracts, or arranges with another person to transport waste or used tires shall utilize only a person holding a valid waste and used tire hauler registration from the department, unless the hauler is exempt as specified in Section 42954.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42954.

(a) A person who hauls waste or used tires is exempt from registration under this chapter if at least one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The person transports fewer than 10 waste or used tires at any one time.

(2) The person is, or hauls used and waste tires in a vehicle owned and operated by, the United States, the State of California, or any county, city, town, or municipality in the state, except when the vehicle the public agency owns or operates is used as a waste and used tire carrier for hire.

(3) The waste or used tires were inadvertently mixed
 or commingled with solid waste, and it is not economical or safe to remove or recover them.

(4) The load containing the used or waste tires originated outside the boundaries of the state and is destined for a point outside the boundaries of the state, if no waste or used tires are loaded or unloaded within the boundaries of the state.

(5) The person is hauling waste or used tires for agricultural purposes. However, notwithstanding Section 42961.5, a person hauling waste or used tires for agricultural purposes shall carry the manifest or manifest information required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42961.5 in a format approved or required by the department in the vehicle during transportation, which may be destroyed after delivery.

(6) The waste or used tires were hauled by a common carrier who transported something other than waste or used tires to an original destination point and then transported waste or used tires on the return part of the trip, and the revenue derived from the waste or used tires is incidental when compared to the revenue earned by the carrier.

(7) The person, who is not a waste tire generating business, is transporting waste or used tires to an amnesty day event or to a location that meets the conditions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 42951, and has received written authorization, which includes specific conditions and dates, from the local enforcement agency. The local enforcement agency shall provide copies of any written authorizations to the department within 30 days of
 their issuance.

(8) The person is transporting illegally dumped waste or used tires to an amnesty day event or to a location that meets the conditions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 42951, and has received written authorization, which includes specific conditions and dates and documentation that a police report has been filed for the illegally dumped tires, from the local enforcement agency. The local enforcement agency shall provide copies of any written authorizations to the department within 30 days of their issuance.

(9) The person complies with any additional conditions for exemption, as approved by the department.

(b) A person who transports tires to a location that does not meet the conditions
 specified in subdivision (b) of Section 42951 shall not be exempt pursuant to subdivision (a), except as specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 4.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42955.

An application for a new or renewed waste and used tire hauler registration shall be made on a form approved by the department. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A vehicle description, vehicle identification number, vehicle license number, and the name of the registered vehicle owner for each vehicle used for transporting waste or used tires.

(b) The business name under which the hauler operates, and the business owners’ name, address, and telephone number.

(c) Other business names under which the hauler
 operates.

(d) A bond in favor of the State of California in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Proof of bond renewal shall be submitted with the application for annual renewal of a waste and used tire hauler registration.

(e) Any additional information required by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 5.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42956.

(a) Upon approval of an application submitted pursuant to Section 42955, the department shall issue a waste and used tire hauler registration to be carried in the vehicle and a waste and used tire hauler decal to be permanently affixed to the lower right hand corner of the windshield.

(b) Any person who operates a vehicle or who authorizes the operation of a vehicle that transports 10 or more tires without a valid and current waste and used tire hauler registration, as issued by the department pursuant to Section 42955, shall be subject to the enforcement actions specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 42962).

(c) The waste and used tire hauler registration shall be presented upon demand of an authorized representative of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 6.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42957.

An application for a new or renewed tire broker registration shall be made in a format approved by the department. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The business name under which the tire broker operates, and the business owner’s name, address, and telephone number.

(b) Other business names under which the tire broker operates.

(c) Any additional information required by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 16.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Renewal, Suspension, and Revocation [42958. - 42961.7.]

42958.

The initial waste and used tire hauler registration issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid from the date of issuance to January 1 of the subsequent calendar year. Subsequent renewals shall be valid for one calendar year. The registration shall be renewed prior to its expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42960.

(a) The department may suspend, revoke, or deny a waste and used tire hauler registration for a period of up to three years, by serving a statement of issue in accordance with Section 42961, if the applicant for, or holder of, the registration does any of the following:

(1) Commits more than three violations of, or fails to comply with any requirements of, this chapter or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 42800), or the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, within a one-year period.

(2) Commits, aids, or abets any violation of this chapter or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 42800), or the regulations
 adopted pursuant to those provisions, or permits an agent to do so, and the department determines that the violation poses an immediate threat of harm to public safety or to the environment.

(3) Commits, aids, or abets a failure to comply with this chapter or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 42800), or the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, or permits an agent to do so, and the department determines that the failure to comply shows a repeating or recurring occurrence or that the failure to comply may pose a threat to public health or safety or the environment.

(4) Misrepresents or fails to disclose material factual information, or other required information in the application for a waste and used tire hauler registration, or misrepresents or omits factual information on any manifest more than three times in one
 year.

(b) The department may suspend, revoke, or deny a waste and used tire hauler registration for a period of three years to five years, or may suspend, revoke, or deny a waste and used tire hauler registration permanently, in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (a), under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The hauler’s registration has been previously revoked or denied for any violation specified in subdivision (a).

(2) The hauler has been previously fined pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 42800).

(3) The department determines that the hauler’s operations pose a significant threat to public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 17.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42961.

(a) The department shall notify the applicant for, or holder of, the registration of the revocation, suspension, or denial of the registration and the effective date of the suspension and revocation and, at the same time, shall serve the person with a statement of issues.

(b) Upon a request for a hearing by the department from the applicant for, or the holder of, the registration, the department shall, within 15 days, schedule a hearing before the director. The hearing shall be held within 90 days after that scheduling date, unless a later date is agreed to by both the department and the applicant for, or the holder of, the registration.

(c) A revocation or suspension issued pursuant to Section 42960 shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the department’s director has issued a decision.

(d) After conducting the hearing, the director shall, within 60 days after the case is submitted, issue a decision, including an order setting for the issuance, suspension, revocation, or denial of the permit. If the decision is not transmitted within this period, the revocation or suspension shall be of no further effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 19.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42961.1.

A hearing required under this chapter shall be conducted by the director in accordance with the informal hearing requirements specified in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, but the department may initially file a hearing pursuant to, or convert a hearing to be conducted pursuant to, the formal hearing requirements specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 20.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42961.5.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “California Uniform Waste and Used Tire Manifest” or “manifest” means a shipping record that contains all of the information required by the department, including, but not limited to, an accurate measurement of the number of tires being shipped, the type or types of the tires, the date the shipment originated or reached its destination, and the origin and intended final destination of the shipment, in a format approved or required by the department.

(2) “Waste and used tire hauler” means any person required to be
 registered with the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42951.

(b) Any waste and used tire hauler transporting waste or used tires for offsite handling, altering, storage, or disposal, or for any combination thereof, shall complete a California Uniform Waste and Used Tire Manifest, in a manner approved or required by the department.

(c) (1) Any waste and used tire hauler shall have the California Uniform Waste and Used Tire Manifest readily accessible in the transporting vehicle during transportation by paper copy or electronic means. The manifest shall be shown upon demand to any representative of the department, any officer of the California Highway Patrol, any peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, or any
 local public officer designated by the department.

(2) For each load of waste and used tires transferred, a waste and used tire hauler shall provide the completed manifest or the completed manifest information in a format approved by the department to the operator of the waste or used tire facility from which the waste and used tire hauler is receiving or transferring waste or used tires, or to which the waste and used tire hauler is transferring waste or used tires, at the time of transfer.

(3) Each waste and used tire hauler shall maintain a copy of each completed manifest or the completed manifest information in a manner approved or required by the department for a period of time required by the department, and shall submit to the department a legible copy of each
 manifest or the manifest information, in a format required by the department, including, but not limited to, an electronic format, within a set time period required by the department. The manifest or manifest information submitted to the department shall contain the signed acknowledgment of the waste tire facility from or to which waste or used tires were transferred.

(d) (1) Each waste or used tire facility that transfers waste or used tires to a waste and used tire hauler or that receives waste or used tires from a waste or used tire hauler that was transported with a manifest pursuant to this section shall maintain copies of the manifest or manifest information in a format authorized or required by the department, and any other information the department deems necessary to track the flow of waste and used tires
 through the state, for each load of waste or used tires transferred or received, and make the manifest copies or manifest information available for review at the department’s request. The copy submitted to the department shall contain the approval of each transporter and the facility operator.

(2) Each waste or used tire facility that transfers waste or used tires to a waste and used tire hauler or that receives waste or used tires from a waste or used tire hauler that was transported with a manifest pursuant to this section shall check that the information on the manifest or in the manifest information recorded by the waste and used tire hauler is correct at the time of transfer in a manner required by the department.

(e) The department shall develop and implement a system for auditing
 manifests submitted to the department pursuant to this section, for the purpose of enforcing this section. The department or its agent shall continuously conduct random sampling and matching of manifests submitted by any person generating waste or used tires, hauling waste or used tires, or operating waste or used tire facilities, to assure compliance with this section.

(f) (1) The department may require any waste and used tire generator, waste and used tire hauler, or operator of a waste tire facility that is subject to the manifest requirements of this section to record, maintain, and submit the required manifest information in an electronic format, in lieu of maintaining and submitting a paper copy of the manifest. The electronic record shall include all information
 required to be on the California Uniform Waste and Used Tire Manifest, and any other information required by the department.

(2) A waste and used tire generator, waste and used tire hauler, or operator of a waste tire facility that is subject to paragraph (1) may submit the electronic reports to the board on a schedule determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 7.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42961.7.

(a) A tire broker shall submit periodic information to the department on the used or waste tires arranged to be shipped by the tire broker to, from, or through the state.

 (b) The department shall specify the schedule for the submission of the information required by subdivision (a) and the manner in which the information shall be provided to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 534, Sec. 21.   (AB 1647)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [42962. - 42963.]

42962.

(a) Any person who does any of the following shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of a separate provision or for continuing violations for each day that violation continues:

(1) Intentionally or negligently violates any permit, rule, regulation, standard, or requirement issued or adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Knowingly, or with reckless disregard, makes any false statement or representation in any application, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of
 compliance with this chapter.

(b) Liability under subdivision (a) may be imposed in a civil action.

(c) In addition to the civil penalty that may be imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may impose civil penalties administratively in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation of a separate provision or for continuing violations for each day that violation continues, on any person who intentionally or negligently violates any permit, rule, regulation, standard, or requirement issued or adopted pursuant to this chapter. The department shall adopt regulations that specify the procedures and amounts for the imposition of administrative civil penalties pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 8.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42962.5.

Any traffic officer, as defined in Section 625 of the Vehicle Code, and any peace officer, as specified in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, may enforce this chapter as authorized representatives of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 9.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42963.

(a) This chapter, or any regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42966, is not a limitation on the power of a city, county, or district to impose and enforce reasonable land use conditions or restrictions on facilities that handle waste or used tires in order to protect the public health and safety or the environment, including preventing or mitigating potential nuisances, if the conditions or restrictions do not conflict with, or impose less stringent requirements than, this chapter or those regulations. However, this chapter, including any regulations that are adopted pursuant to Section 42966, is intended to establish a uniform statewide program for the regulation of waste and used tire haulers that will prevent
 the illegal disposal of tires, but that will not subject waste and used tire haulers to multiple registration or manifest requirements. Therefore, any local laws regulating the transportation of waste or used tires are preempted by this chapter.

(b) Upon request of a city, county, or city and county, the department may designate, in writing, that city, county, or city and county to exercise the enforcement authority granted to the department under this chapter. A city, county, or city and county designated by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall follow the same procedures set forth for the department under this article. This designation shall not limit the authority of the department to take action it deems necessary or proper to ensure the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 10.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Provisions [42964. - 42964.]

42964.

The department may expend funds from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of implementation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 11.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Administration [42966. - 42967.]

42966.

The department shall administer this chapter. The department may adopt any regulations necessary or useful to carry out this chapter or any of the department’s duties or responsibilities imposed pursuant to this chapter. The department shall initially, as soon as possible, adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for safety, and general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall
 remain in effect for a period not to exceed 120 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 12.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42967.

(a) The costs of administering this chapter shall be paid from fees deposited in the California Tire Recycling Management Fund pursuant to Section 42889.

(b) The department may develop a legislative proposal for an alternative fee system for the payment of the costs of administering this chapter and submit that proposal to the Legislature for its consideration as part of the 1994–95 fiscal year budget review process.
